Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-3,157
Lost or mutilated license plate, registration certificate, or decal; duplicate; fees.

If a license plate, registration certificate, or weight or validation decal is lost or mutilated or has become illegible, the person to whom such license plate, registration certificate, or decal has been issued shall immediately apply to the county treasurer for a duplicate registration certificate or for new license plates and decals, accompanying his or her application with a fee of one dollar for a duplicate registration certificate and a fee of two dollars and fifty cents for a duplicate or replacement license plate and decals. No fee shall be required under this section if the vehicle or trailer was reported stolen under section 60-178.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 157;

Laws 2009, LB175, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 84;

Laws 2025, LB97, § 23.